test/src/gt-norm-yamls/N-avvdagiehtje_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

  Noun - åvvdågiehtje: # N_EVEN_NOCG (no grade alternations)
    åvvdågiehtje+N+Sg+Nom: åvvdågiehtje
    åvvdågiehtje+N+Sg+Gen: åvvdågietje
    åvvdågiehtje+N+Sg+Acc: åvvdågietjev
    åvvdågiehtje+N+Sg+Ill: åvvdågiehtjáj
    åvvdågiehtje+N+Sg+Ine: åvvdågietjen
    åvvdågiehtje+N+Sg+Ela: [åvvdågietjest, åvvdågietjes]
    åvvdågiehtje+N+Sg+Com: [åvvdågetjijn, åvvdågetjijna]
    åvvdågiehtje+N+Pl+Nom: åvvdågietje
    åvvdågiehtje+N+Pl+Gen: åvvdågetjij
    åvvdågiehtje+N+Pl+Acc: åvvdågetjijd
    åvvdågiehtje+N+Pl+Ill: åvvdågetjijda
    åvvdågiehtje+N+Pl+Ine: åvvdågetjijn
    åvvdågiehtje+N+Pl+Ela: [åvvdågetjijst, åvvdågetjijs]
    åvvdågiehtje+N+Pl+Com: [åvvdågetjij, åvvdågetjijgum]
    åvvdågiehtje+N+Ess: åvvdågiehtjen
